Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 6. Regulation of Traffic on Highways

§ 31-18-601.
Requirements generally.

In addition to the requirements contained in chapter 5 of this title, all operators of commercial vehicles shall comply with the requirements contained in this article.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-602.
Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossings.

No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten (10) or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than one-half (1/2) inch per foot of the distance between any two (2) adjacent axles or in any event of less than nine (9) inches, measured above the level surface of a roadway, upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section.

Notice of the intended crossing shall be given to a station agent of the railroad and a reasonable time shall be given to the railroad to provide proper protection at the crossing.

Before making the crossing the person operating or moving the vehicle or equipment shall first stop the vehicle or equipment not less than fifteen (15) feet nor more than fifty (50) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment. The vehicle shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal, crossing gates or a flagman or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train, other on-track equipment or car. If a flagman is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing shall be under his direction.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 84; C.S. 1945, § 60-684; W.S. 1957, § 31-91; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-115

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

31-5-114

; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to railroad grade crossings generally, see §§

31-5-510

and

31-5-511

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “approaching train”; added “or other on-track equipment” following “a train” in (c); and added “, other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

31-5-114

, effective July 1, 1993.

§ 31-18-603.
Loads on vehicles.

No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless the vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking or otherwise escaping therefrom. This section does not prohibit the necessary spreading of any substance in highway maintenance or construction operations.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-604.
Maximum speed limits.

The operator of a commercial vehicle shall comply with the speed limits as established pursuant to W.S.

31-5-301

and, for violations, shall be subject to the penalties as prescribed in W.S.

31-5-1201

.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2.

§ 31-18-605.
Stopping requirements for certain vehicles at railroad crossings.

The driver of any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire or of any vehicle carrying a cargo or part of a cargo required to be placarded under United States department of transportation regulations, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, shall:

Actuate the vehicle’s four-way hazard flashers prior to stopping at the grade crossing;

Stop the vehicle within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad;

While stopped, listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment and not proceed until he can do so safely;

Upon proceeding, cross the tracks without manually shifting gears and only in a gear of the vehicle which does not require manually changing gears while traversing the crossing;

After crossing the tracks, cancel the four-way hazard flashers; and

Comply with all other federal, state or local laws or regulations pertaining to railroad-highway grade crossings.

This section shall not apply at:

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is controlled by a police officer or flagman;

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is regulated by a traffic-control signal;

Any railroad grade crossing protected by crossing gates or an alternately flashing light signal intended to give warning of the approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

Any railroad grade crossing at which an official traffic-control device gives notice that the stopping requirement imposed by this section does not apply.

The department may adopt such regulations as may be necessary describing additional vehicles which must comply with the stopping requirements of this section.

A driver or employer of a driver who is convicted of violating this section, or an employer who knowingly allows, requires, permits or authorizes a driver to violate this section, shall also be subject to the civil penalties provided by 49 C.F.R. 383.53, as amended as of March 1, 2007.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 2007, ch. 17, § 2; 2011, ch. 31, § 1; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(vi); in (d), inserted “or an employer who knowingly allows, requires, permits or authorizes a driver to violate this section”; and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “approaching train”; added “or other on-track equipment” following “a train” in (a)(iii); and added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (b)(iii).

§ 31-18-606.
Metal tires; implements of husbandry.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, it shall be permissible to use implements of husbandry with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

§ 31-18-607.
Out-of-service orders.

The department shall adopt regulations regarding issuance of out-of-service orders for drivers committing violations identified in 49 C.F.R., as amended as of March 1, 2007, or the 2006 North American uniform out-of-service criteria published by the Commercial Vehicle Safety Alliance.

A driver or employer of a driver convicted of violating an out-of-service order issued to the driver, the employer or a motor carrier, or an employer who knowingly allows, requires, permits or authorizes a driver to violate an out-of-service order issued to the driver, the employer or a motor carrier, shall be subject to the civil penalties specified by 49 C.F.R. 383.53, as amended as of July 5, 2007.

As used in this section, the term “out-of-service order” means as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxxii).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 17, § 1; 2011, ch. 31, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), inserted “issued to the driver, the employer or a motor carrier, or an employer who knowingly allows, requires, permits or authorizes a driver to violate an out-of-service order issued to the driver, the employer or a motor carrier,” and substituted “July 5” for “March 1”; and added (c).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 17, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.